Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6636XS (1) 91 ms/md S.F. 2124 Section 1. Section 425.15, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. For homestead credits allowed 3 against property taxes due and payable in the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2027, if the owner of a homestead allowed 5 a credit under this subchapter does not meet the criteria 6 of subsection 1 and is any of the following, the amount 7 of the credit allowed on the homestead from the homestead 8 credit fund shall be the greater of the amount of the credit 9 authorized under section 425.1, subsection 2, or an amount 10 equal to a percentage of the entire amount of the tax levied 11 on the homestead that is equivalent to the ownerâs permanent 12 service-connected disability rating percentage: 13 (1) A veteran as defined in section 35.1 with a permanent 14 service-connected disability rating that is less than one 15 hundred percent but equal to or greater than seventy percent, 16 as certified by the United States department of veterans 17 affairs. 18 (2) A former member of the national guard of any state 19 who otherwise meets the service requirements of section 35.1, 20 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) or (7), with a 21 permanent service-connected disability rating of less than one 22 hundred percent but equal to or greater than seventy percent, 23 as certified by the United States department of veterans 24 affairs. 25 b. For homestead credits allowed against property taxes 26 due and payable in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, 27 if the owner of a homestead allowed a credit under this 28 subchapter does not meet the criteria of subsection 1 and is 29 any of the following, the amount of the credit allowed on the 30 homestead from the homestead credit fund shall be the greater 31 of the amount of the credit authorized under section 425.1, 32 subsection 2, or an amount equal to a percentage of the entire 33 amount of the tax levied on the homestead that is equivalent 34 to the ownerâs permanent service-connected disability rating 35 -1- LSB 6636XS (1) 91 ms/md 1/ 4 S.F. 2124 percentage: 1 (1) A veteran as defined in section 35.1 with a permanent 2 service-connected disability rating that is less than one 3 hundred percent but equal to or greater than forty percent, as 4 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs. 5 (2) A former member of the national guard of any state 6 who otherwise meets the service requirements of section 35.1, 7 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) or (7), with a 8 permanent service-connected disability rating of less than one 9 hundred percent but equal to or greater than forty percent, as 10 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs. 11 c. For homestead credits allowed against property taxes due 12 and payable in the fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 13 2029, if the owner of a homestead allowed a credit under this 14 subchapter does not meet the criteria of subsection 1 and is 15 any of the following, the amount of the credit allowed on the 16 homestead from the homestead credit fund shall be the greater 17 of the amount of the credit authorized under section 425.1, 18 subsection 2, or an amount equal to a percentage of the entire 19 amount of the tax levied on the homestead that is equivalent 20 to the ownerâs permanent service-connected disability rating 21 percentage: 22 (1) A veteran as defined in section 35.1 with a permanent 23 service-connected disability rating that is less than one 24 hundred percent but equal to or greater than ten percent, as 25 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs. 26 (2) A former member of the national guard of any state 27 who otherwise meets the service requirements of section 35.1, 28 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) or (7), with a 29 permanent service-connected disability rating of less than one 30 hundred percent but equal to or greater than ten percent, as 31 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs. 32 Sec. 2. Section 425.15, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. For an owner described in subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , 35 -2- LSB 6636XS (1) 91 ms/md 2/ 4 S.F. 2124 âbâ , or âcâ , or subsection 1A, the credit allowed shall be 1 continued to the estate of an owner who is deceased or the 2 surviving spouse and any child, as defined in section 234.1 , 3 who are the beneficiaries of a deceased owner, so long as the 4 surviving spouse remains unmarried. 5 Sec. 3. Section 425.15, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 3. An owner or a beneficiary of an owner who elects to 8 secure the credit provided in this section under the conditions 9 described in subsection 1 is not eligible for any other real 10 property tax exemption provided by law for veterans of military 11 service. 12 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE UPON ENACTMENT. This Act, being deemed of 13 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 14 Sec. 5. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 15 retroactively to homestead credit claims filed on or after 16 January 1, 2026, for credits allowed against property taxes due 17 and payable in fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2027. 18